Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 2 Public Employee Retirement Plans Generally
Subchapter 4
— Reciprocal Service Credits

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 120, provided:

“Uncodified Section 18 of Act 1022 of 2005 is amended to read as follows: It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System that this act should become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-2-401 — 24-2-405 may not apply to § 24-2-407 and § 24-2-408 which were enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1965, No. 488, § 9: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is urgent need to clarify the present law relating to the reciprocal service credits between the various state supported retirement systems; that under the present reciprocal service law certain members of the various state supported retirement systems are not eligible to establish reciprocal service agreements. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1969, No. 81, § 5: Feb. 21, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly that many public employers are being denied the services of competent help on an extra-help or part-time basis and that retired public employees are being deprived of compensation as an extra-help or part-time employer under existing laws; and only by the immediate operation of this Act may these conditions be alleviated. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 579, § 5: Apr. 6, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that members of the reciprocal retirement system should be entitled to disability retirement benefits; that present provisions under the reciprocal retirement system do not provide for disability retirement benefits; and, that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to correct this situation; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 586, § 11: Became law without Governor's signature, Apr. 3, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this act clarify coverage, service, credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and, in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 611, § 9: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is urgent need to clarify the present law relating to the reciprocal service credits between the various state supported retirement systems; that under the present reciprocal service law certain members of the various state supported retirement systems are not eligible to establish reciprocal service agreements. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1977, No. 663, § 8: Mar. 23, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this Act clarify coverage, service credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; and in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 127, § 3: Feb. 13, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly, that there is a need to prevent loss of benefits for in-service death in connection with reciprocity between state supported retirement systems and that the immediate effectiveness of this Act is essential and delay could work irreparable harm upon system members. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 493, § 3: Mar. 21, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that some public employees have been denied participation in public retirement systems through no fault of their own and should be granted an opportunity to participate. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 821, § 6: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act change the rate of contributions, and benefits under the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System; and, in order to enable persons to receive proper benefits thereunder without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 483, § 5: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that benefits now being paid to retired members of the State Police Retirement System are not consistent with benefits being paid to retired members of other State supported retirement plans and, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1983, No. 679, § 4: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the retirement benefits payable under reciprocity by preceding systems are inadequate and unfair to certain retirees having service in more than one state retirement system. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1987, No. 357, § 7: Mar. 23, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is in the best interest of the public health, welfare and safety that members in the public safety category of the Public Employees Retirement System should be permitted to transfer to another employment protecting the public health and safety and that current retirement laws discourage said transfers. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 949, § 7: Apr. 6, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System is not a reciprocal system with other state supported retirement systems; that this creates an inequitable situation for public officials are members of the Judicial Retirement System and who later become members of another state supported retirement system; and that it is necessary to change the laws of Arkansas to correct this inequity. Therefore, in order to promote equity between the public retirement systems of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 485, § 12: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that public safety members for the Public Employees' Retirement System earn credit at one and one-half times the normal rate of service credit; that the dollar cost to the System of this service credit is too expensive and is escalating with the addition of other groups of employees as public safety members; and that it is necessary to restrain the future use and costs to the System of this service credit and to implement this act at the beginning of the States' fiscal year. Therefore, in order to reduce the financial burden on the Public Employees Retirement System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 857, § 7: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the alternate retirement plans for the state colleges and universities and the state's vocational-technical schools are not reciprocal systems with other state supported retirement systems; that this creates an inequitable situation for the educators and administrators who are members of these alternative retirement systems and who later become members of another state supported retirement system; and that it is necessary to change the laws of Arkansas to correct this inequity and have it effective at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, in order to promote equity between the public retirement systems of Arkansas and promote sound fiscal administration, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 927, § 8: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws on the reciprocity of retirement systems does cover deferred retirement option accounts; that the retention of experienced employees, especially in skilled labor positions and highly technical fields, is beneficial to the Arkansas state government and with the hiring of employees at younger ages, more qualified and experienced employees are reaching retirement eligibility earlier in their careers; and that immediate passage of the act is essential to the efficient administration of state government and implementation of the provisions of this act is necessary to begin at the start of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1022, § 18: Mar. 18, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System that this act should become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 177, § 15: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this bill affects the structure of the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System and the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the ideal time to make revisions to the retirement systems is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-2-401. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Deferred retirement option plan” means an option for retirement under a reciprocal system whereby the retirement system members, in lieu of terminating employment, can continue with employment with covered employers and can accept a service retirement benefit pursuant to deferred retirement option plan provisions in § 24-7-1301 et seq. for the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System or for any other deferred retirement option plan which might be created by, or authorized for creation by, law under a reciprocal system;

“Public safety service covered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System” means service as a public safety member as defined in § 24-4-101(34);

“Reciprocal system” means:

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System in operation June 30, 1957, and continued by §§ 24-7-202 — 24-7-205, 24-7-301 — 24-7-305, 24-7-401 — 24-7-411, 24-7-501, 24-7-502, 24-7-601 — 24-7-604, 24-7-606, 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-713, 24-7-715, and 24-7-716;

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-5-103;

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-4-103;

The State Police Retirement System, established by § 24-6-203;

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, established by § 24-8-201 et seq.;

An alternate retirement plan for:

A college, university, or the Division of Higher Education provided for under § 24-7-801 et seq.; or

A vocational-technical school or the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Adult Education Section, and the Office of Skills Development, provided for under § 24-7-901 et seq.; or

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System provided for under § 24-10-101 et seq.; and

“State employer” means:

The public employer whose employees are covered under:

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System;

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; or

The State Police Retirement System;

The public employer whose employees are circuit court judges, judges of the Court of Appeals, and justices of the Supreme Court, whether elected or appointed to office, covered under the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System;

The public employer whose employees are district court judges, whether elected or appointed to office, covered under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; or

A public employer who is:

A college, university, or the Division of Higher Education whose employees are covered by an alternate retirement plan provided for under § 24-7-801 et seq.; or

A vocational-technical school or the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Adult Education Section, and the Office of Skills Development, whose employees are covered by an alternate retirement plan provided for under § 24-7-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 488, § 1; 1975, No. 611, § 1; 1981, No. 483, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2537; Acts 1987, No. 357, § 2; 1995, No. 949, § 1; 1997, No. 485, § 1; 1997, No. 857, § 1; 1997, No. 927, § 1; 1999, No. 537, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 3; 2005, No. 1022, § 1; 2007, No. 177, §§ 6, 7; 2011, No. 978, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2362, 2363.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment deleted “and by a person who was employed prior to July 1, 1997” at the end of (2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (3)(F)(i) and (4)(D)(i); and substituted “Division of Career and Technical Education, Adult Education Section of the Division of Workforce Services, and the Office of Skills Development” for “Department of Career Education” in (3)(F)(ii) and (4)(D)(ii).

24-2-402. Deferred annuity — Eligibility — Definition.

If a member of a reciprocal system left or leaves a position covered by a reciprocal system, if an employee in a position covered by a reciprocal system left the employ of a state employer before the latter position was covered by a reciprocal system, or if an employee in a position later covered by a reciprocal system leaves that position before it is covered by a reciprocal system, which in this section in each case is called the “preceding system”, and if that person entered or enters a position covered by a reciprocal system, which in this section is called the “succeeding system”, and if the person is a member of the succeeding system after July 1, 1975, then the person shall be entitled to a deferred annuity payable by the preceding system subject to the following conditions:

The person has credited service acquired in the employ of the preceding state employer;

The person does not withdraw his or her accumulated contributions from the preceding reciprocal system, or if he or she has withdrawn his or her accumulated contributions, he or she deposits with the preceding reciprocal system the amount he or she withdrew, together with interest from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment at the rate in effect for the preceding reciprocal system, but that deposit must be made while he or she is an active member of a reciprocal system.

In addition to the forfeited credited service, the active member of a reciprocal system shall receive credit for his or her previous employment with a public employer upon his or her paying the prescribed employee and employer contributions based upon the rate in effect during the previous employment, together with regular interest from the dates for the previous service to the date of repayment.

The provisions for determining a year of service credit shall be the prevailing rules of each reciprocal system;

The person qualifies for age and service retirement in the succeeding reciprocal system using his or her credited service in force with the preceding reciprocal system plus his or her credited service acquired in the employ of succeeding state employers to meet the minimum service requirements of the succeeding systems;

The person's annuity payable by the preceding reciprocal system shall be upon the basis of the annuity formula of the preceding reciprocal system, exclusive of any minimum amount at the time the person begins to receive monthly retirement benefits from that system.

The final average compensation to be used to determine monthly benefits payable to that person shall be that of the reciprocal system which furnishes the highest final average compensation at the time of retirement, but each reciprocal system shall use the method of computing final average compensation stipulated by its law, and compensation in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall not be used to determine final average compensation.

Any person retiring on or after July 1, 1982, with credited service in more than one (1) reciprocal system shall have his or her benefits recomputed based on the provisions of this section;

It is the expressed intention of this subdivision (5) to provide the same death-in-service benefits that would have been payable had the member died while an active member of a reciprocal retirement system.

A member who dies in service while a member of one (1) reciprocal system shall be considered as currently employed by all systems in which the member retains credited service.

If a member has accrued credited service under the provisions of this subchapter but dies before retirement or before becoming eligible to retire, then the benefits payable shall be those provided by the reciprocal retirement system named in this subchapter, with each system being responsible for the payment of the death-in-service benefits provided by the applicable provisions of its retirement laws.

If death-in-service benefits are payable by more than one (1) reciprocal system to eligible survivors of a deceased member, the survivors shall not receive more, as a percentage of the deceased member's final pay or as a minimum dollar amount, than the largest amount payable by any single reciprocal system.

Each reciprocal system that has a minimum benefit provision in its plan shall pay only a proportionate share of that minimum amount based on the ratio of service in that system to the total service in all reciprocal systems.

If the reciprocal system is an alternate retirement plan under § 24-7-801 et seq. or § 24-7-901 et seq., death-in-service benefits shall be contingent on provision of that benefit having been provided by the alternate retirement plan and having been selected by the member as a benefit;

Both service in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as a member of the General Assembly and service in another reciprocal system during the same period of time may be counted to meet the service requirements for benefits from the reciprocal system subject to the following:

The benefit payable by a reciprocal system will be based on the credited service in that system and the final average compensation under that system. However, nothing in this subdivision (6)(A) shall diminish the General Assembly member's right to a benefit for which the person is qualified under the provisions of § 24-4-706 [repealed]; and

“Final average compensation” as used in this section means the combined highest salaries from the preceding and succeeding systems equaling thirty-six (36) complete months divided by three (3) if a member has:

Fewer than twenty (20) years of credited service on July 1, 2009; and

Fewer than three (3) years of service in a succeeding reciprocal system.

If the member is a state police officer covered under § 24-6-401 et seq., the combined salaries shall be from the preceding system and State Police Retirement System equaling forty-eight (48) months divided by four (4);

If the preceding or succeeding reciprocal system is the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System and the member's benefits are determined under § 24-8-201 et seq., the benefit payable by the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall be determined by multiplying the benefit provided by § 24-8-218 by the following fraction:

The numerator shall be the number of the actual years of service credited in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System as a justice of the Supreme Court or judge of the circuit or chancery courts or the Court of Appeals; and

The denominator shall be fourteen (14) years.

In no instance shall the benefit payable by the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System exceed the benefit provided by § 24-8-218;

If the preceding or succeeding reciprocal system offers a deferred retirement option plan for its members, both service in the preceding and the succeeding reciprocal system may be counted to meet the minimum service credit requirements for benefits under a system's deferred retirement option plan.

The benefit payable by the preceding reciprocal system shall be based on the annuity formula of the preceding reciprocal system, exclusive of any minimum amount at the time the person begins to receive monthly retirement benefits from that system under its deferred retirement option provisions.

The final average compensation to be used to determine monthly benefits payable to that person shall be that of the reciprocal system which furnishes the highest final average compensation at the time of retirement, but each reciprocal system shall use the method of computing final average compensation stipulated by its law, and compensation in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall not be used to determine final average compensation.

Any interest credited to the deferred retirement account will be paid to the member's account under the deferred retirement option benefit program in effect for that system.

The boards of trustees of each preceding or succeeding system shall promulgate such rules as are necessary to coordinate their benefits with any system providing a deferred retirement option plan; and

If the preceding or succeeding reciprocal system is an alternate retirement plan for a college, university, or the Division of Higher Education provided for under § 24-7-801 et seq., or for a vocational-technical school or the Department of Career Education provided for under § 24-7-901 et seq., the benefits payable shall be in accordance with terms specified in the written alternate retirement plan document for purchasing the insurance policies or annuity contracts, both fixed and variable in nature, for the participants.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 488, § 2; 1967, No. 310, § 1; 1971, No. 579, §§ 1, 2; 1975, No. 611, § 2; 1977, No. 663, § 5; 1979, No. 127, § 1; 1979, No. 493, § 1; 1979, No. 821, § 4; 1983, No. 679, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2538; Acts 1987, No. 357, § 3; 1987, No. 737, § 1; 1991, No. 381, § 1; 1995, No. 949, § 2; 1997, No. 485, § 2; 1997, No. 857, § 2; 1997, No. 927, § 2; 1999, No. 537, §§ 2, 5; 2001, No. 151, § 4; 2005, No. 1022, §§ 2, 3; 2007, No. 177, §§ 8, 9; 2009, No. 742, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2844, 2845.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Ark. Const., Am. 80, § 19(A)(2) provided that all circuit, chancery, and circuit-chancery judges “in office at the time this Amendment takes effect shall continue in office as Circuit judges…” Amendment 80 further provided in§ 19(B)(1) that the circuit courts would “assume the jurisdiction of Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts.” Amendment 80 also provides that many of the lower courts will combine into district courts. The first portion of Amendment 80, § 19(B)(2) states: “District Courts shall have the jurisdiction vested in Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Courts, Justice of the Peace Courts, and Courts of Common Pleas at the time this Amendment
takes effect. District Courts shall assume the jurisdiction of these courts of limited jurisdiction and other jurisdiction conferred in this Amendment on January 1, 2005.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote (6)(B).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (2)(C); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (8)(B).

24-2-403. Date of annuity payment.

The date a member's annuity, if any, becomes payable by each reciprocal system shall be determined by those provisions in force for each reciprocal system.

In no case shall any annuity become payable nor be paid prior to the date the member retires from, and ceases to be, in the employ of an employer covered by a reciprocal system as defined in § 24-2-401(3).

History.

Acts 1965, No. 488, § 4; 1975, No. 611, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2540; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 5.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Ark. Const., Am. 80, § 19(A)(2) provided that all circuit, chancery, and circuit-chancery judges “in office at the time this Amendment takes effect shall continue in office as Circuit judges . . .” Amendment 80 further provided in § 19(B)(1) that the circuit courts would “assume the jurisdiction of Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts.” Amendment 80 also provides that many of the lower courts will combine into district courts. The first portion of Amendment 80, § 19(B)(2) states: “District Courts shall have the jurisdiction vested in Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Court, Justice of the Peace Courts, and Courts of Common Pleas at the time this Amendment takes effect. District Court shall assume the jurisdiction of these courts of limited jurisdiction and other jurisdiction confirmed in this Amendment on January 1, 2005.”

24-2-404. Disbursement of annuities.

The boards of trustees of the reciprocal systems may enter into an agreement whereby the reciprocal system from which a member retires shall be the disbursing system for his or her annuities payable, as provided in this subchapter, by the other reciprocal systems.

The agreement shall provide, but shall not be limited to, the manner and frequency with which the disbursing system shall be reimbursed for the annuities payable by the other reciprocal systems.

Except for provisions of this section regarding the deferred retirement option plan under § 24-7-1301 et seq. for the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, the provisions of this section shall not apply to retirants in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 488, § 5; 1967, No. 310, § 2; 1969, No. 81, §§ 2, 3; 1973, No. 586, § 7; 1975, No. 611, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2541; Acts 1997, No. 927, § 3.

24-2-405. Disability benefits.

A member of a reciprocal system with five (5) or more years of credited service in two (2) or more reciprocal systems shall be eligible to apply for disability benefits from each reciprocal system in which he or she has credited service.

Each reciprocal system shall make the determination under its respective rules as to whether the member is eligible for disability benefits.

The member shall be eligible for a refund of his or her accumulated contributions plus interest, if any, from any reciprocal system in which he or she does not qualify for disability benefits. This refund shall not alter his or her eligibility for benefits from any other reciprocal system.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 488, § 3; 1971, No. 579, § 3; 1975, No. 611, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2539; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 2846.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

24-2-406. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1987, No. 525, § 1, repealed “Section 5 of Act 488 of 1965, as amended [Ark. Stat. 12-2541.1].” It is deemed that this repeal should refer to § 6 of the 1965 act, which was compiled as A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2541.1 and subsequently codified as this section.

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning resumption of employment, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 525, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1965, No. 488, § 6, as added by 1975, No. 611, § 6; 1981, No. 859, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2541.1.

24-2-407. Benefit enhancements — Restrictions.

No benefit enhancement provided for by this subchapter shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization.

No benefit enhancement provided for by this subchapter shall be implemented by any publicly supported system which has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 927, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-2-401 — 24-2-405 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-2-408. Concurrence prohibited.

In establishing credited service under this subchapter, persons who receive credited service pursuant to § 24-4-101(17)(B)(xiii) for dual full-time employment in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System under the provisions of this act may count periods of credited service covering the same calendar time only once (1) time.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 764, § 2.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 2001, No. 764, is codified as §§ 24-4-401 and 24-2-408.